Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-248.03
Civil citation form.

To achieve uniformity,
the Supreme Court shall prescribe the form of a civil citation which conforms
to the requirements for a civil citation in section 43-248.02 and such other
matter as the court deems appropriate. The civil citation shall not include
a place for the cited juvenile's social security number.

Laws 2010, LB800, § 11.